Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6284.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 46-15 of the General Laws entitled "Water Resources Management"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-15-24. Rental fees.
Twenty percent (20%) of all rental fees collected by the water resources board pursuant to
a lease agreement with the Coventry Pines Golf Club or a memorandum of understanding with the
town of Coventry, shall be remitted as follows:
(1) Ten percent (10%) to the town of Coventry; and
(2) Ten percent (10%) to the Central Coventry Fire District.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002828
========